Hawaii statutes.
§11-98 Forms and materials used in
elections. Books, blanks, records, certificates, and other forms and
materials required by this title shall be of uniform character suitable for the
voting system in use and shall be prescribed by the chief election officer
after consultation with the clerks involved. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next